Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-251
Limited partner; liability to third parties.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, a limited partner is not liable for the obligations of a limited partnership unless he or she is also a general partner or, in addition to the exercise of his or her rights and powers as a limited partner, he or she participates in the control of the business. However, if the limited partner participates in the control of the business, he or she is liable only to persons who transact business with the limited partnership with actual knowledge of his or her participation in control reasonably believing, based upon the limited partner's conduct, that the limited partner is a general partner. An assignee of a partnership interest who is not admitted as an additional limited partner shall not be liable for the obligations of a limited partnership.

(b) A limited partner does not participate in the control of the business within the meaning of subsection (a) of this section solely by virtue of possessing or exercising one or more of the following powers:

(1) The power to be an independent contractor for or to transact business with the limited partnership, including the power to be a contractor for or an agent or employee of the limited partnership or of a general partner, or to be an officer, director, or equity security holder of a general partner which is a corporation, or to be a contractor for or an agent, employee, or member of a general partner which is a limited liability company, or to be an officer, partner, or equity security holder of a general partner which is a partnership, or to be a fiduciary or beneficiary of an estate or trust which is a general partner, or any combination of these roles, whether solely or jointly with others and irrespective of whether that general partner is the sole general partner of the limited partnership or is a general partner of one or more limited partnerships;

(2) The power to consult with and advise a general partner with respect to any matter concerning the business of the limited partnership;

(3) The power to act as surety, guarantor, or endorser for the limited partnership or a general partner, to guaranty or assume one or more specific obligations of the limited partnership or a general partner, to borrow money from the limited partnership or a general partner, to lend money to the limited partnership or a general partner, or to provide collateral for the limited partnership;

(4) The power to propose, approve, or disapprove by voting, by number, financial interest, class, or group or as otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, or otherwise vote on one or more of the following matters:

(i) The dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership or an election to continue the limited partnership or an election to continue the business of the limited partnership;

(ii) The sale, exchange, lease, mortgage, assignment, pledge, or other transfer of or granting a security interest in any asset or assets of the limited partnership;

(iii) The incurrence, renewal, refinancing, or payment or other discharge of indebtedness by the limited partnership;

(iv) A change in the nature of the business;

(v) The removal, admission, or retention of a general partner;

(vi) The removal, admission, or retention of a limited partner;

(vii) A transaction or other matter involving an actual or potential conflict of interest;

(viii) An amendment to the partnership agreement or certificate of limited partnership;

(ix) The merger or consolidation of a limited partnership;

(x) In respect of a limited partnership which is registered as an investment company under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, any matter required by the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, or the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission thereunder, to be approved by the holders of beneficial interests in an investment company, including the electing of directors or trustees of the investment company, the approving or terminating of investment advisory or underwriting contracts, and the approving of auditors;

(xi) The indemnification of any partner or other person; or

(xii) Such other matters as are stated in the partnership agreement or in any other agreement or writing as being subject to the approval or disapproval of limited partners;

(5) The power to call, request, attend, or participate at a meeting of the partners or the limited partners;

(6) The power to wind up a limited partnership pursuant to section 67-278;

(7) The power to take any action required or permitted by law to bring, pursue, settle, or otherwise terminate a derivative action in the right of the limited partnership;

(8) The power to serve on a committee of the limited partnership or the limited partners; or

(9) The power to exercise any right or power granted or permitted to limited partners under the Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act and not specifically enumerated in this subsection.

(c) The enumeration in subsection (b) of this section does not mean that the possession or exercise of any other powers by a limited partner constitutes participation by him or her in the control of the business of the limited partnership.

(d) A limited partner who knowingly permits his or her name to be used in the name of the limited partnership, except under circumstances permitted by subdivision (2) of section 67-234, is liable to creditors who extend credit to the limited partnership without actual knowledge that the limited partner is not a general partner.

(e) This section shall not create any rights or powers of limited partners. Such rights and powers may be created only by a certificate of limited partnership, a partnership agreement, or any other agreement or writing or by the Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 19;

Laws 1982, LB 589, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 26;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 403;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 85.